Illinois, session 104th, SB8.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Safe 5Gun Storage Act. 6    Section 5. Storage of firearms. A firearm owner shall not 7store or keep any firearm in any premises where the firearm 8owner knows or reasonably should know a minor without the 9lawful permission of the minor's parent, guardian, or person 10having charge of the minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited 11person is likely to gain access to the firearm unless the 12firearm is secured in a locked container, properly engaged so 13as to render the firearm inaccessible or unusable to any 14person other than the owner or other lawfully authorized user. 15If the firearm is carried by or under the control of the owner 16or other lawfully authorized user, then the firearm is deemed 17lawfully stored or kept. This Section does not apply (i) if the 18minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited person gains access 19to a firearm and uses it in a lawful act of self-defense or 20defense of another or (ii) to any firearm obtained by a minor, 21an at-risk person, or a prohibited person because of an 22unlawful entry of the premises by the minor, at-risk person, 23prohibited person or another person.   SB0008 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    Section 10. Penalties; violations. 2    (a) In this Act:3    "At-risk person" means a person who has made statements or 4exhibited behavior that indicates to a reasonable person there 5is a likelihood that the person is at risk of attempting 6suicide or causing physical harm to oneself or others.7    "Minor" means a person under 18 years of age; however, 8"minor" does not include a member of the United States Armed 9Forces or the Illinois National Guard.10    "Premises" includes any land, building, structure, 11vehicle, or place directly or indirectly under the control of 12the firearm owner.13    "Prohibited person" means a person ineligible under 14federal or State law to possess a firearm. "Prohibited person" 15does not include a person who is otherwise eligible to own a 16firearm pursuant to the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act 17but does not, at the time of the violation, have a Firearm 18Owner's Identification Card.19    (b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) and 20(3) of this subsection (b), a violation of Section 5 is subject 21to a civil penalty not to exceed $500.22    (2) If any person knows or reasonably should know that a 23minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited person is likely to 24gain access to a firearm belonging to or under the control of 25that person, and a minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited   SB0008 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1person obtains the firearm, the civil penalty shall not exceed 2$1,000.3    (3) If a minor, an at-risk person, or a prohibited person 4obtains a firearm and uses it to injure or cause the death of a 5person or uses the firearm in connection with a crime, the 6civil penalty shall not exceed $10,000. 7    (c) The court may order a person who is found in violation 8of Section 5 to perform community service or pay restitution 9in lieu of the civil penalties imposed under this Section if 10good cause is shown.11    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preclude 12civil liabilities for violations of this Act.13    (e) A violation of this Act is prima facie evidence of 14negligence per se in any civil proceeding if a minor, an 15at-risk person, or a prohibited person obtains a firearm and 16causes personal injury or the death of oneself or another or 17uses the firearm in the commission of a crime. 18    (f) An action to collect a civil penalty under this Act may 19be brought by the Attorney General or the State's Attorney of 20the county in which the violation occurred. Any money received 21from the collection of a civil penalty under this Act shall be 22deposited in the Mental Health Fund.  23     Section 85. The Gun Trafficking Information Act is 24amended by changing Section 10-5 as follows:   SB0008 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    (5 ILCS 830/10-5)2    Sec. 10-5. Gun trafficking information. 3    (a) The Illinois State Police shall use all reasonable 4efforts, as allowed by State law and regulations, federal law 5and regulations, and executed Memoranda of Understanding 6between Illinois law enforcement agencies and the U.S. Bureau 7of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, in making 8publicly available, on a regular and ongoing basis, key 9information related to firearms used in the commission of 10crimes in this State, including, but not limited to: reports 11on crimes committed with firearms, locations where the crimes 12occurred, the number of persons killed or injured in the 13commission of the crimes, whether or not a stolen firearm was 14used in the commission of the crimes, the state where the 15firearms used originated, the Federal Firearms Licensee that 16sold the firearm, the type of firearms used, if known, annual 17statistical information concerning Firearm Owner's 18Identification Card and concealed carry license applications, 19revocations, and compliance with Section 9.5 of the Firearm 20Owners Identification Card Act, the information required in 21the report or on the Illinois State Police's website under 22Section 85 of the Firearms Restraining Order Act, and firearm 23dealer license certification inspections. The Illinois State 24Police shall make the information available on its website, 25which may be presented in a dashboard format, in addition to 26electronically filing a report with the Governor and the   SB0008 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1General Assembly. The report to the General Assembly shall be 2filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the 3Secretary of the Senate in electronic form only, in the manner 4that the Clerk and the Secretary shall direct. 5    (b) The Illinois State Police shall study, on a regular 6and ongoing basis, and compile reports on the number of 7Firearm Owner's Identification Card checks to determine 8firearms trafficking or straw purchase patterns. The Illinois 9State Police shall, to the extent not inconsistent with law, 10share such reports and underlying data with academic centers, 11foundations, and law enforcement agencies studying firearms 12trafficking, provided that personally identifying information 13is protected. For purposes of this subsection (b), a Firearm 14Owner's Identification Card number is not personally 15identifying information, provided that no other personal 16information of the card holder is attached to the record. The 17Illinois State Police may create and attach an alternate 18unique identifying number to each Firearm Owner's 19Identification Card number, instead of releasing the Firearm 20Owner's Identification Card number itself.21    (c) Each department, office, division, and agency of this 22State shall, to the extent not inconsistent with law, 23cooperate fully with the Illinois State Police and furnish the 24Illinois State Police with all relevant information and 25assistance on a timely basis as is necessary to accomplish the 26purpose of this Act. The Illinois Criminal Justice Information   SB0008 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1Authority shall submit the information required in subsection 2(a) of this Section to the Illinois State Police, and any other 3information as the Illinois State Police may request, to 4assist the Illinois State Police in carrying out its duties 5under this Act.6(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23.) 8    Section 90. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 9amended by changing Sections 3, 3.1, 8, and 8.1 and by adding 10Section 7.10 as follows: 11    (430 ILCS 65/3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-3)12    Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in Section 3a, no person may 13knowingly transfer, or cause to be transferred, any firearm, 14firearm ammunition, stun gun, or taser to any person within 15this State unless the transferee with whom he deals displays 16either: (1) a currently valid Firearm Owner's Identification 17Card which has previously been issued in his or her name by the 18Illinois State Police under the provisions of this Act; or (2) 19a currently valid license to carry a concealed firearm which 20has previously been issued in his or her name by the Illinois 21State Police under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. In 22addition, all firearm, stun gun, and taser transfers by 23federally licensed firearm dealers are subject to Section 3.1 24and beginning January 1, 2027, the federally licensed firearm   SB0008 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1dealers shall check the Illinois State Police Internet-based 2system upon which the serial numbers of firearms that have 3been reported stolen are available for public access for 4individuals to ensure any firearms are not reported stolen 5prior to the sale or transfer of a firearm under subsection 6(a-25) of this Section. New firearms shipped directly from the 7manufacturer are exempt from this provision.8    (a-5) Any person who is not a federally licensed firearm 9dealer and who desires to transfer or sell a firearm while that 10person is on the grounds of a gun show must, before selling or 11transferring the firearm, request the Illinois State Police to 12conduct a background check on the prospective recipient of the 13firearm in accordance with Section 3.1 and beginning January 141, 2027, the person who is not a federally licensed firearm 15dealer shall check the Illinois State Police Internet-based 16system upon which the serial numbers of firearms that have 17been reported stolen are available for public access for 18individuals to ensure any firearms are not reported stolen 19prior to the sale or transfer of a firearm under subsection 20{a-25} of this Section. New firearms shipped directly from the 21manufacturer are exempt from this provision. 22    (a-10) Notwithstanding item (2) of subsection (a) of this 23Section, any person who is not a federally licensed firearm 24dealer and who desires to transfer or sell a firearm or 25firearms to any person who is not a federally licensed firearm 26dealer shall, before selling or transferring the firearms,   SB0008 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1contact a federal firearm license dealer under paragraph (1) 2of subsection (a-15) of this Section to conduct the transfer 3or the Illinois State Police with the transferee's or 4purchaser's Firearm Owner's Identification Card number to 5determine the validity of the transferee's or purchaser's 6Firearm Owner's Identification Card under State and federal 7law, including the National Instant Criminal Background Check 8System. This subsection shall not be effective until July 1, 92023. Until that date the transferor shall contact the 10Illinois State Police with the transferee's or purchaser's 11Firearm Owner's Identification Card number to determine the 12validity of the card. The Illinois State Police may adopt 13rules concerning the implementation of this subsection. The 14Illinois State Police shall provide the seller or transferor 15an approval number if the purchaser's Firearm Owner's 16Identification Card is valid. Approvals issued by the Illinois 17State Police for the purchase of a firearm pursuant to this 18subsection are valid for 30 days from the date of issue.19    (a-15) The provisions of subsection (a-10) of this Section 20do not apply to:21        (1) transfers that occur at the place of business of a 22    federally licensed firearm dealer, if the federally 23    licensed firearm dealer conducts a background check on the 24    prospective recipient of the firearm in accordance with 25    Section 3.1 of this Act and follows all other applicable 26    federal, State, and local laws as if he or she were the   SB0008 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    seller or transferor of the firearm, although the dealer 2    is not required to accept the firearm into his or her 3    inventory. The purchaser or transferee may be required by 4    the federally licensed firearm dealer to pay a fee not to 5    exceed $25 per firearm, which the dealer may retain as 6    compensation for performing the functions required under 7    this paragraph, plus the applicable fees authorized by 8    Section 3.1;9        (2) transfers as a bona fide gift to the transferor's 10    husband, wife, son, daughter, stepson, stepdaughter, 11    father, mother, stepfather, stepmother, brother, sister, 12    nephew, niece, uncle, aunt, grandfather, grandmother, 13    grandson, granddaughter, father-in-law, mother-in-law, 14    son-in-law, or daughter-in-law;15        (3) transfers by persons acting pursuant to operation 16    of law or a court order;17        (4) transfers on the grounds of a gun show under 18    subsection (a-5) of this Section;19        (5) the delivery of a firearm by its owner to a 20    gunsmith for service or repair, the return of the firearm 21    to its owner by the gunsmith, or the delivery of a firearm 22    by a gunsmith to a federally licensed firearms dealer for 23    service or repair and the return of the firearm to the 24    gunsmith;25        (6) temporary transfers that occur while in the home 26    of the unlicensed transferee, if the unlicensed transferee   SB0008 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    is not otherwise prohibited from possessing firearms and 2    the unlicensed transferee reasonably believes that 3    possession of the firearm is necessary to prevent imminent 4    death or great bodily harm to the unlicensed transferee;5        (7) transfers to a law enforcement or corrections 6    agency or a law enforcement or corrections officer acting 7    within the course and scope of his or her official duties;8        (8) transfers of firearms that have been rendered 9    permanently inoperable to a nonprofit historical society, 10    museum, or institutional collection; and11        (9) transfers to a person who is exempt from the 12    requirement of possessing a Firearm Owner's Identification 13    Card under Section 2 of this Act.14    (a-20) The Illinois State Police shall develop an 15Internet-based system for individuals to determine the 16validity of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card prior to the 17sale or transfer of a firearm. The Illinois State Police shall 18have the Internet-based system updated and available for use 19by January 1, 2024. The Illinois State Police shall adopt 20rules not inconsistent with this Section to implement this 21system; but no rule shall allow the Illinois State Police to 22retain records in contravention of State and federal law. On 23or before January 1, 2027, the Internet-based system shall 24include a written notice, in both English and Spanish, of a 25firearm owner's obligation to report to local law enforcement 26any lost or stolen firearm within 48 hours after the owner   SB0008 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1first discovers the loss or theft. 2    (a-25) On or before January 1, 2022, the Illinois State 3Police shall develop an Internet-based system upon which the 4serial numbers of firearms that have been reported stolen are 5available for public access for individuals to ensure any 6firearms are not reported stolen prior to the sale or transfer 7of a firearm under this Section. The Illinois State Police 8shall have the Internet-based system completed and available 9for use by July 1, 2022. The Illinois State Police shall adopt 10rules not inconsistent with this Section to implement this 11system. On or before January 1, 2027, the Illinois State 12Police shall make the Internet-based system created under this 13subsection accessible to federally licensed firearms dealers 14to verify that the make, model, and serial numbers of firearms 15that are being bought, sold, or transferred by the dealers 16have not been reported stolen and shall also provide a receipt 17or approval number to a transferor or federally licensed 18firearms dealer as verification that the firearm being 19transferred did not appear on the stolen firearm database. 20    (a-30) On or before January 1, 2027, the Illinois State 21Police shall establish an electronic mechanism by which law 22enforcement shall report individuals who have failed to report 23the loss or theft of a firearm pursuant to Section 24-4.1 of 24the Criminal Code of 2012. 25    (b) Any person within this State who transfers or causes 26to be transferred any firearm, stun gun, or taser shall keep a   SB0008 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1record of such transfer for a period of 10 years from the date 2of transfer. Any person within this State who receives any 3firearm, stun gun, or taser pursuant to subsection (a-10) 4shall provide a record of the transfer within 10 days of the 5transfer to a federally licensed firearm dealer and shall not 6be required to maintain a transfer record. The federally 7licensed firearm dealer shall maintain the transfer record for 820 years from the date of receipt. A federally licensed 9firearm dealer may charge a fee not to exceed $25 to retain the 10record. The record shall be provided and maintained in either 11an electronic or paper format. The federally licensed firearm 12dealer shall not be liable for the accuracy of any information 13in the transfer record submitted pursuant to this Section. 14Such records shall contain the date of the transfer; the 15description, serial number or other information identifying 16the firearm, stun gun, or taser if no serial number is 17available; and, if the transfer was completed within this 18State, the transferee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card 19number and any approval number or documentation provided by 20the Illinois State Police pursuant to subsection (a-10) of 21this Section; if the transfer was not completed within this 22State, the record shall contain the name and address of the 23transferee. On or after January 1, 2006, the record shall 24contain the date of application for transfer of the firearm. 25On demand of a peace officer such transferor shall produce for 26inspection such record of transfer. For any transfer pursuant   SB0008 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1to subsection (a-10) of this Section, on the demand of a peace 2officer, such transferee shall identify the federally licensed 3firearm dealer maintaining the transfer record. If the 4transfer or sale took place at a gun show, the record shall 5include the unique identification number. Failure to record 6the unique identification number or approval number is a petty 7offense. For transfers of a firearm, stun gun, or taser made on 8or after January 18, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 9100-1178), failure by the private seller to maintain the 10transfer records in accordance with this Section, or failure 11by a transferee pursuant to subsection a-10 of this Section to 12identify the federally licensed firearm dealer maintaining the 13transfer record, is a Class A misdemeanor for the first 14offense and a Class 4 felony for a second or subsequent offense 15occurring within 10 years of the first offense and the second 16offense was committed after conviction of the first offense. 17Whenever any person who has not previously been convicted of 18any violation of subsection (a-5), the court may grant 19supervision pursuant to and consistent with the limitations of 20Section 5-6-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. A transferee 21or transferor shall not be criminally liable under this 22Section provided that he or she provides the Illinois State 23Police with the transfer records in accordance with procedures 24established by the Illinois State Police. The Illinois State 25Police shall establish, by rule, a standard form on its 26website.   SB0008 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    (b-5) Any resident may purchase ammunition from a person 2within or outside of Illinois if shipment is by United States 3mail or by a private express carrier authorized by federal law 4to ship ammunition. Any resident purchasing ammunition within 5or outside the State of Illinois must provide the seller with a 6copy of his or her valid Firearm Owner's Identification Card 7or valid concealed carry license and either his or her 8Illinois driver's license or Illinois State Identification 9Card prior to the shipment of the ammunition. The ammunition 10may be shipped only to an address on either of those 2 11documents.12    (c) The provisions of this Section regarding the transfer 13of firearm ammunition shall not apply to those persons 14specified in paragraph (b) of Section 2 of this Act.15(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-24; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 17    (430 ILCS 65/3.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-3.1)18    Sec. 3.1. Firearm Transfer Inquiry Program. 19    (a) The Illinois State Police shall provide a dial up 20telephone system or utilize other existing technology which 21shall be used by any federally licensed firearm dealer, gun 22show promoter, or gun show vendor who is to transfer a firearm, 23stun gun, or taser under the provisions of this Act. The 24Illinois State Police may utilize existing technology which 25allows the caller to be charged a fee not to exceed $2. Fees   SB0008 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1collected by the Illinois State Police shall be deposited in 2the State Police Firearm Services Fund and used to provide the 3service. Beginning January 1, 2027, a federally licensed 4firearm dealer, gun show promoter, and gun show vendor shall 5additionally check the Illinois State Police Internet-based 6system upon which the serial numbers of firearms that have 7been reported stolen are available for public access to ensure 8any firearms are not reported stolen prior to the sale or 9transfer of a firearm under subsection (a-25) of Section 3 of 10this Act. New firearms shipped directly from the manufacturer 11are exempt from this provision. 12    (b) Upon receiving a request from a federally licensed 13firearm dealer, gun show promoter, or gun show vendor, the 14Illinois State Police shall immediately approve or, within the 15time period established by Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code 16of 2012 regarding the delivery of firearms, stun guns, and 17tasers, notify the inquiring dealer, gun show promoter, or gun 18show vendor of any objection that would disqualify the 19transferee from acquiring or possessing a firearm, stun gun, 20or taser. In conducting the inquiry, the Illinois State Police 21shall initiate and complete an automated search of its 22criminal history record information files and those of the 23Federal Bureau of Investigation, including the National 24Instant Criminal Background Check System, and of the files of 25the Department of Human Services relating to mental health and 26developmental disabilities to obtain any felony conviction or   SB0008 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1patient hospitalization information which would disqualify a 2person from obtaining or require revocation of a currently 3valid Firearm Owner's Identification Card.4    (b-5) By January 1, 2023, the Illinois State Police shall 5by rule provide a process for the automatic renewal of the 6Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a person at the time of 7an inquiry in subsection (b). Persons eligible for this 8process must have a set of fingerprints on file with their 9applications under either subsection (a-25) of Section 4 or 10the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 11    (c) If receipt of a firearm would not violate Section 24-3 12of the Criminal Code of 2012, federal law, or this Act, the 13Illinois State Police shall:14        (1) assign a unique identification number to the 15    transfer; and16        (2) provide the licensee, gun show promoter, or gun 17    show vendor with the number.18    (d) Approvals issued by the Illinois State Police for the 19purchase of a firearm are valid for 30 days from the date of 20issue. 21    (e) (1) The Illinois State Police must act as the Illinois 22Point of Contact for the National Instant Criminal Background 23Check System.24    (2) The Illinois State Police and the Department of Human 25Services shall, in accordance with State and federal law 26regarding confidentiality, enter into a memorandum of   SB0008 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1understanding with the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the 2purpose of implementing the National Instant Criminal 3Background Check System in the State. The Illinois State 4Police shall report the name, date of birth, and physical 5description of any person prohibited from possessing a firearm 6pursuant to the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or 18 7U.S.C. 922(g) and (n) to the National Instant Criminal 8Background Check System Index, Denied Persons Files. 9    (3) The Illinois State Police shall provide notice of the 10disqualification of a person under subsection (b) of this 11Section or the revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 12Identification Card under Section 8 or Section 8.2 of this 13Act, and the reason for the disqualification or revocation, to 14all law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction to assist with 15the seizure of the person's Firearm Owner's Identification 16Card. 17    (f) The Illinois State Police shall adopt rules not 18inconsistent with this Section to implement this system.19(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 20102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 21    (430 ILCS 65/7.10 new)22    Sec. 7.10. Notice of obligation to report lost or stolen 23firearm. Upon the issuance and each renewal of a Firearm 24Owner's Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall 25advise the applicant or holder in writing, in both English and   SB0008 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1Spanish, of his or her obligation to report to local law 2enforcement any lost or stolen firearm within 48 hours after 3he or she first discovers the loss or theft. A person is deemed 4to have discovered that a firearm was lost or stolen only when 5the person has received evidence indicating that a loss or 6theft has occurred. 7    (430 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8)8    Sec. 8. Grounds for denial and revocation. The Illinois 9State Police has authority to deny an application for or to 10revoke and seize a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 11previously issued under this Act only if the Illinois State 12Police finds that the applicant or the person to whom such card 13was issued is or was at the time of issuance:14        (a) A person under 21 years of age who has been 15    convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or 16    adjudged delinquent;17        (b) This subsection (b) applies through the 180th day 18    following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 19    101-80). A person under 21 years of age who does not have 20    the written consent of his parent or guardian to acquire 21    and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or whose 22    parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, or 23    where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 24    Firearm Owner's Identification Card;25        (b-5) This subsection (b-5) applies on and after the   SB0008 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 2    Public Act 101-80). A person under 21 years of age who is 3    not an active duty member of the United States Armed 4    Forces or the Illinois National Guard and does not have 5    the written consent of his or her parent or guardian to 6    acquire and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or 7    whose parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, 8    or where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 9    Firearm Owner's Identification Card; 10        (c) A person convicted of a felony under the laws of 11    this or any other jurisdiction;12        (d) A person addicted to narcotics;13        (e) A person who has been a patient of a mental health 14    facility within the past 5 years or a person who has been a 15    patient in a mental health facility more than 5 years ago 16    who has not received the certification required under 17    subsection (u) of this Section. An active law enforcement 18    officer employed by a unit of government or a Department 19    of Corrections employee authorized to possess firearms who 20    is denied, revoked, or has his or her Firearm Owner's 21    Identification Card seized under this subsection (e) may 22    obtain relief as described in subsection (c-5) of Section 23    10 of this Act if the officer or employee did not act in a 24    manner threatening to the officer or employee, another 25    person, or the public as determined by the treating 26    clinical psychologist or physician, and the officer or   SB0008 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    employee seeks mental health treatment;2        (f) A person whose mental condition is of such a 3    nature that it poses a clear and present danger to the 4    applicant, any other person or persons, or the community;5        (g) A person who has an intellectual disability;6        (h) A person who intentionally makes a false statement 7    in the Firearm Owner's Identification Card application or 8    endorsement affidavit;9        (i) A noncitizen who is unlawfully present in the 10    United States under the laws of the United States;11        (i-5) A noncitizen who has been admitted to the United 12    States under a non-immigrant visa (as that term is defined 13    in Section 101(a)(26) of the Immigration and Nationality 14    Act (8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(26))), except that this subsection 15    (i-5) does not apply to any noncitizen who has been 16    lawfully admitted to the United States under a 17    non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:18            (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 19        hunting or sporting purposes;20            (2) an official representative of a foreign 21        government who is:22                (A) accredited to the United States Government 23            or the Government's mission to an international 24            organization having its headquarters in the United 25            States; or26                (B) en route to or from another country to   SB0008 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1            which that noncitizen is accredited;2            (3) an official of a foreign government or 3        distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 4        designated by the Department of State;5            (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 6        friendly foreign government entering the United States 7        on official business; or8            (5) one who has received a waiver from the 9        Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 18 10        U.S.C. 922(y)(3);11        (j) (Blank);12        (k) A person who has been convicted within the past 5 13    years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, violation 14    of an order of protection, or a substantially similar 15    offense in another jurisdiction, in which a firearm was 16    used or possessed;17        (l) A person who has been convicted of domestic 18    battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a substantially 19    similar offense in another jurisdiction committed before, 20    on or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public 21    Act 97-158). If the applicant or person who has been 22    previously issued a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 23    under this Act knowingly and intelligently waives the 24    right to have an offense described in this paragraph (l) 25    tried by a jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results 26    in a conviction for an offense in which a domestic   SB0008 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    relationship is not a required element of the offense but 2    in which a determination of the applicability of 18 U.S.C. 3    922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of the Code of 4    Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the court of a 5    judgment of conviction for that offense shall be grounds 6    for denying an application for and for revoking and 7    seizing a Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously 8    issued to the person under this Act;9        (m) (Blank);10        (n) A person who is prohibited from acquiring or 11    possessing firearms or firearm ammunition by any Illinois 12    State statute or by federal law;13        (o) A minor subject to a petition filed under Section 14    5-520 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 alleging that the 15    minor is a delinquent minor for the commission of an 16    offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony; 17        (p) An adult who had been adjudicated a delinquent 18    minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for the 19    commission of an offense that if committed by an adult 20    would be a felony;21        (q) A person who is not a resident of the State of 22    Illinois, except as provided in subsection (a-10) of 23    Section 4; 24        (r) A person who has been adjudicated as a person with 25    a mental disability; 26        (s) A person who has been found to have a   SB0008 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    developmental disability; 2        (t) A person involuntarily admitted into a mental 3    health facility; or 4        (u) A person who has had his or her Firearm Owner's 5    Identification Card revoked or denied under subsection (e) 6    of this Section or item (iv) of paragraph (2) of 7    subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act because he or she 8    was a patient in a mental health facility as provided in 9    subsection (e) of this Section, shall not be permitted to 10    obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, after the 11    5-year period has lapsed, unless he or she has received a 12    mental health evaluation by a physician, clinical 13    psychologist, or qualified examiner as those terms are 14    defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 15    Disabilities Code, and has received a certification that 16    he or she is not a clear and present danger to himself, 17    herself, or others. The physician, clinical psychologist, 18    or qualified examiner making the certification and his or 19    her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 20    professionally liable for making or not making the 21    certification required under this subsection, except for 22    willful or wanton misconduct. This subsection does not 23    apply to a person whose firearm possession rights have 24    been restored through administrative or judicial action 25    under Section 10 or 11 of this Act; or26        (v) A person who fails 2 or more times to report a loss   SB0008 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    or theft of a firearm within 48 hours of the discovery of 2    such loss or theft to local law enforcement as required 3    under subsection (a) of Section 24-4.1 of the Criminal 4    Code of 2012. 5    Upon revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 6Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall provide 7notice to the person and the person shall comply with Section 89.5 of this Act. 9(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 115-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 12    (430 ILCS 65/8.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8.1)13    Sec. 8.1. Notifications to the Illinois State Police. 14    (a) The Circuit Clerk shall, in the form and manner 15required by the Supreme Court, notify the Illinois State 16Police of all final dispositions of cases for which the 17Department has received information reported to it under 18Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of the Criminal Identification Act.19    (b) Upon adjudication of any individual as a person with a 20mental disability as defined in Section 1.1 of this Act or a 21finding that a person has been involuntarily admitted, the 22court shall direct the circuit court clerk to immediately 23notify the Illinois State Police, Firearm Owner's 24Identification (FOID) department, and shall forward a copy of 25the court order to the Department.   SB0008 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    (b-1) Beginning July 1, 2016, and each July 1 and December 230 of every year thereafter, the circuit court clerk shall, in 3the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, 4notify the Illinois State Police, Firearm Owner's 5Identification (FOID) department if the court has not directed 6the circuit court clerk to notify the Illinois State Police, 7Firearm Owner's Identification (FOID) department under 8subsection (b) of this Section, within the preceding 6 months, 9because no person has been adjudicated as a person with a 10mental disability by the court as defined in Section 1.1 of 11this Act or if no person has been involuntarily admitted. The 12Supreme Court may adopt any orders or rules necessary to 13identify the persons who shall be reported to the Illinois 14State Police under subsection (b), or any other orders or 15rules necessary to implement the requirements of this Act. 16    (c) The Department of Human Services shall, in the form 17and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, report all 18information collected under subsection (b) of Section 12 of 19the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 20Confidentiality Act for the purpose of determining whether a 21person who may be or may have been a patient in a mental health 22facility is disqualified under State or federal law from 23receiving or retaining a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, 24or purchasing a weapon.25    (d) If a person is determined to pose a clear and present 26danger to himself, herself, or to others:  SB0008 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1        (1) by a physician, clinical psychologist, or 2    qualified examiner, or is determined to have a 3    developmental disability by a physician, clinical 4    psychologist, or qualified examiner, whether employed by 5    the State or privately, then the physician, clinical 6    psychologist, or qualified examiner shall, within 24 hours 7    of making the determination, notify the Department of 8    Human Services that the person poses a clear and present 9    danger or has a developmental disability; or10        (2) by a law enforcement official or school 11    administrator, then the law enforcement official or school 12    administrator shall, within 24 hours of making the 13    determination, notify the Illinois State Police that the 14    person poses a clear and present danger. 15    The Department of Human Services shall immediately update 16its records and information relating to mental health and 17developmental disabilities, and if appropriate, shall notify 18the Illinois State Police in a form and manner prescribed by 19the Illinois State Police. The Illinois State Police shall 20determine whether to revoke the person's Firearm Owner's 21Identification Card under Section 8 of this Act. Any 22information disclosed under this subsection shall remain 23privileged and confidential, and shall not be redisclosed, 24except as required under subsection (e) of Section 3.1 of this 25Act, nor used for any other purpose. The method of providing 26this information shall guarantee that the information is not   SB0008 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1released beyond what is necessary for the purpose of this 2Section and shall be provided by rule by the Department of 3Human Services. The identity of the person reporting under 4this Section shall not be disclosed to the subject of the 5report. The physician, clinical psychologist, qualified 6examiner, law enforcement official, or school administrator 7making the determination and his or her employer shall not be 8held criminally, civilly, or professionally liable for making 9or not making the notification required under this subsection, 10except for willful or wanton misconduct.11    (d-5) If a law enforcement official determines that a 12person has failed to report a lost or stolen firearm as 13required by Section 24-4.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, then 14the law enforcement official shall, within 24 hours of making 15that determination, notify the Illinois State Police that the 16person has failed to report a lost or stolen firearm. The law 17enforcement official shall notify the Illinois State Police in 18a form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. Any 19information disclosed under this subsection shall remain 20privileged and confidential, and shall not be redisclosed, 21except as required under subsection (e) of Section 3.1 of this 22Act, nor used for any other purpose. 23    (e) The Illinois State Police shall adopt rules to 24implement this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB0008 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    Section 95. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 2adding Section 56 as follows: 3    (430 ILCS 66/56 new)4    Sec. 56. Notice of obligation to report lost or stolen 5firearm. Upon the issuance and each renewal of a concealed 6carry license, the Illinois State Police shall advise the 7applicant or licensee in writing, in both English and Spanish, 8of his or her obligation to report to local law enforcement any 9lost or stolen firearm within 48 hours after he or she first 10discovers the theft or loss. 11    Section 100. The Firearm Dealer License Certification Act 12is amended by changing Section 5-20 as follows: 13    (430 ILCS 68/5-20)14    Sec. 5-20. Additional licensee requirements. 15    (a) A certified licensee shall make a photo copy of a 16buyer's or transferee's valid photo identification card 17whenever a firearm sale transaction takes place. The photo 18copy shall be attached to the documentation detailing the 19record of sale.20    (b) A certified licensee shall post in a conspicuous 21position on the premises where the licensee conducts business 22a sign that contains the following warning in block letters 23not less than one inch in height:  SB0008 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1        "With few exceptions enumerated in the Firearm Owners 2    Identification Card Act, it is unlawful for you to:3            (A) store or leave an unsecured firearm in a place 4        where a child can obtain access to it; 5            (B) sell or transfer your firearm to someone else 6        without receiving approval for the transfer from the 7        Illinois State Police, or8            (C) fail to report the loss or theft of your 9        firearm to local law enforcement within 48 72 hours.".10This sign shall be created by the Illinois State Police and 11made available for printing or downloading from the Illinois 12State Police's website.13    (c) No retail location established after the effective 14date of this Act shall be located within 500 feet of any 15school, pre-school, or day care facility in existence at its 16location before the retail location is established as measured 17from the nearest corner of the building holding the retail 18location to the corner of the school, pre-school, or day care 19facility building nearest the retail location at the time the 20retail location seeks licensure.21    (d) A certified dealer who sells or transfers a firearm 22shall notify the purchaser or the recipient, orally and in 23writing, in both English and Spanish, at the time of the sale 24or transfer, that the owner of a firearm is required to report 25a lost or stolen firearm to local law enforcement within 48 26hours after the owner first discovers the loss or theft. The   SB0008 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1Illinois State Police shall create a written notice, in both 2English and Spanish, that certified dealers shall provide 3firearm purchasers or transferees in accordance with this 4provision and make such notice available for printing or 5downloading from the Illinois State Police website. 6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 105. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 8changing Sections 24-3B, 24-4.1, and 24-9 as follows: 9    (720 ILCS 5/24-3B)10    Sec. 24-3B. Firearms trafficking.11    (a) A person commits firearms trafficking when he or she 12has not been issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 13Identification Card and knowingly:14        (1) brings, or causes to be brought, into this State, 15    a firearm or firearm ammunition for the purpose of sale, 16    delivery, or transfer to any other person or with the 17    intent to sell, deliver, or transfer the firearm or 18    firearm ammunition to any other person; or19        (2) brings, or causes to be brought, into this State, 20    a firearm and firearm ammunition for the purpose of sale, 21    delivery, or transfer to any other person or with the 22    intent to sell, deliver, or transfer the firearm and 23    firearm ammunition to any other person; or .24        (3) brings, or causes to be brought, into this State,   SB0008 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    in a vehicle on an expressway in this State, more than one 2    firearm prohibited from possession by Section 24-1.9, per 3    occupants of the vehicle. 4    (a-5) This Section does not apply to: 5        (1) a person exempt under Section 2 of the Firearm 6    Owners Identification Card Act from the requirement of 7    having possession of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 8    previously issued in his or her name by the Illinois State 9    Police in order to acquire or possess a firearm or firearm 10    ammunition; 11        (2) a common carrier under subsection (i) of Section 12    24-2 of this Code; or 13        (3) a non-resident who may lawfully possess a firearm 14    in his or her resident state. 15    (b) Sentence.16        (1) Firearms trafficking is a Class 1 felony for which 17    the person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 18    be sentenced to not less than 4 years and not more than 20 19    years.20        (2) Firearms trafficking by a person who has been 21    previously convicted of firearms trafficking, gunrunning, 22    or a felony offense for the unlawful sale, delivery, or 23    transfer of a firearm or firearm ammunition in this State 24    or another jurisdiction is a Class X felony. 25(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB0008 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    (720 ILCS 5/24-4.1)2    Sec. 24-4.1. Report of lost or stolen firearms. 3    (a) If a person who possesses a valid Firearm Owner's 4Identification Card and who possesses or acquires a firearm 5thereafter loses the firearm, or if the firearm is stolen from 6the person, the person must report the loss or theft of any 7such firearm to the local law enforcement agency within 48 72 8hours after obtaining knowledge of the loss or theft. The 9report shall include:10        (1) the date the firearm was lost or stolen;11        (2) the exact location where the firearm was lost or 12    stolen or, if the exact location is not known, the last 13    known location of the firearm;14        (3) the caliber, make, model, and serial number of the 15    firearm;16        (4) a description of the circumstances under which the 17    firearm was lost or stolen; and 18        (5) the Firearm Owner's Identification Card number of 19    the person making the report, if applicable. 20    (b) A law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall 21take a written report and shall, as soon as practical, and in 22no event later than 48 hours after receiving the report, enter 23the information and the firearm's serial number as stolen into 24the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS).25    (c) A person shall not be in violation of this Section if:26        (1) the failure to report is due to an act of God, act   SB0008 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    of war, or inability of a law enforcement agency to 2    receive the report;3        (2) the person is hospitalized, in a coma, or is 4    otherwise seriously physically or mentally impaired as to 5    prevent the person from reporting; or6        (3) the person's designee makes a report if the person 7    is unable to make the report. 8    (d) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 9of a petty offense for a first violation. A second or 10subsequent violation of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor. 11    (e) A prosecution for an offense under this Section may be 12commenced within 3 years after the discovery by law 13enforcement or prosecution of the failure to report the theft 14or loss of a firearm as required under subsection (a). 15(Source: P.A. 98-508, eff. 8-19-13.) 16    (720 ILCS 5/24-9)17    Sec. 24-9. Firearms; Child Protection. 18    (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), it is unlawful 19for any person to store or leave, within premises under his or 20her control, a firearm if the person knows or has reason to 21believe that a minor under the age of 18 14 years who does not 22have a Firearm Owners Identification Card is likely to gain 23access to the firearm without the lawful permission of the 24minor's parent, guardian, or person having charge of the 25minor, and the minor causes death or great bodily harm with the   SB0008 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1firearm, unless the firearm is: 2        (1) secured by a device or mechanism, other than the 3    firearm safety, designed to render a firearm temporarily 4    inoperable; or 5        (2) placed in a securely locked box or container. ; or 6        (3) placed in some other location that a reasonable 7    person would believe to be secure from a minor under the 8    age of 14 years.9    (b) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 10of a Class C misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than 11$1,000. A second or subsequent violation of this Section is a 12Class A misdemeanor. 13    (c) Subsection (a) does not apply: 14        (1) if the minor under 18 14 years of age gains access 15    to a firearm and uses it in a lawful act of self-defense or 16    defense of another; or 17        (2) to any firearm obtained by a minor under the age of 18    18 14 because of an unlawful entry of the premises by the 19    minor or another person.20    (d) For the purposes of this Section, "firearm" has the 21meaning ascribed to it in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 22Identification Card Act.23(Source: P.A. 91-18, eff. 1-1-00.) 24    Section 110. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 25changing Section 5-4-1 as follows:   SB0008 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    (730 ILCS 5/5-4-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-4-1)2    Sec. 5-4-1. Sentencing hearing. 3    (a) After a determination of guilt, a hearing shall be 4held to impose the sentence. However, prior to the imposition 5of sentence on an individual being sentenced for an offense 6based upon a charge for a violation of Section 11-501 of the 7Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a local 8ordinance, the individual must undergo a professional 9evaluation to determine if an alcohol or other drug abuse 10problem exists and the extent of such a problem. Programs 11conducting these evaluations shall be licensed by the 12Department of Human Services. However, if the individual is 13not a resident of Illinois, the court may, in its discretion, 14accept an evaluation from a program in the state of such 15individual's residence. The court shall make a specific 16finding about whether the defendant is eligible for 17participation in a Department impact incarceration program as 18provided in Section 5-8-1.1 or 5-8-1.3, and if not, provide an 19explanation as to why a sentence to impact incarceration is 20not an appropriate sentence. The court may in its sentencing 21order recommend a defendant for placement in a Department of 22Corrections substance abuse treatment program as provided in 23paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of Section 3-2-2 conditioned 24upon the defendant being accepted in a program by the 25Department of Corrections. At the hearing the court shall:  SB0008 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1        (1) consider the evidence, if any, received upon the 2    trial;3        (2) consider any presentence reports;4        (3) consider the financial impact of incarceration 5    based on the financial impact statement filed with the 6    clerk of the court by the Department of Corrections;7        (4) consider evidence and information offered by the 8    parties in aggravation and mitigation;9        (4.5) consider substance abuse treatment, eligibility 10    screening, and an assessment, if any, of the defendant by 11    an agent designated by the State of Illinois to provide 12    assessment services for the Illinois courts; 13        (5) hear arguments as to sentencing alternatives;14        (6) afford the defendant the opportunity to make a 15    statement in his own behalf;16        (7) afford the victim of a violent crime or a 17    violation of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 18    or a similar provision of a local ordinance, the 19    opportunity to present an oral or written statement, as 20    guaranteed by Article I, Section 8.1 of the Illinois 21    Constitution and provided in Section 6 of the Rights of 22    Crime Victims and Witnesses Act. The court shall allow a 23    victim to make an oral statement if the victim is present 24    in the courtroom and requests to make an oral or written 25    statement. An oral or written statement includes the 26    victim or a representative of the victim reading the   SB0008 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    written statement. The court may allow persons impacted by 2    the crime who are not victims under subsection (a) of 3    Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 4    to present an oral or written statement. A victim and any 5    person making an oral statement shall not be put under 6    oath or subject to cross-examination. All statements 7    offered under this paragraph (7) shall become part of the 8    record of the court. In this paragraph (7), "victim of a 9    violent crime" means a person who is a victim of a violent 10    crime for which the defendant has been convicted after a 11    bench or jury trial or a person who is the victim of a 12    violent crime with which the defendant was charged and the 13    defendant has been convicted under a plea agreement of a 14    crime that is not a violent crime as defined in subsection 15    (c) of 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act;16        (7.5) afford a qualified person affected by: (i) a 17    violation of Section 405, 405.1, 405.2, or 407 of the 18    Illinois Controlled Substances Act or a violation of 19    Section 55 or Section 65 of the Methamphetamine Control 20    and Community Protection Act; or (ii) a Class 4 felony 21    violation of Section 11-14, 11-14.3 except as described in 22    subdivisions (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B), 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 23    11-18.1, or 11-19 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 24    Criminal Code of 2012, committed by the defendant the 25    opportunity to make a statement concerning the impact on 26    the qualified person and to offer evidence in aggravation   SB0008 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    or mitigation; provided that the statement and evidence 2    offered in aggravation or mitigation shall first be 3    prepared in writing in conjunction with the State's 4    Attorney before it may be presented orally at the hearing. 5    Sworn testimony offered by the qualified person is subject 6    to the defendant's right to cross-examine. All statements 7    and evidence offered under this paragraph (7.5) shall 8    become part of the record of the court. In this paragraph 9    (7.5), "qualified person" means any person who: (i) lived 10    or worked within the territorial jurisdiction where the 11    offense took place when the offense took place; or (ii) is 12    familiar with various public places within the territorial 13    jurisdiction where the offense took place when the offense 14    took place. "Qualified person" includes any peace officer 15    or any member of any duly organized State, county, or 16    municipal peace officer unit assigned to the territorial 17    jurisdiction where the offense took place when the offense 18    took place;19        (8) in cases of reckless homicide afford the victim's 20    spouse, guardians, parents or other immediate family 21    members an opportunity to make oral statements;22        (9) in cases involving a felony sex offense as defined 23    under the Sex Offender Management Board Act, consider the 24    results of the sex offender evaluation conducted pursuant 25    to Section 5-3-2 of this Act; and 26        (10) make a finding of whether a motor vehicle was   SB0008 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    used in the commission of the offense for which the 2    defendant is being sentenced; and . 3        (11) make a finding of whether a firearm with a serial 4    number reported as stolen on the Illinois State Police 5    publicly accessible stolen firearms database was used in 6    the commission of the offense for which the defendant is 7    being sentenced. 8    (b) All sentences shall be imposed by the judge based upon 9his independent assessment of the elements specified above and 10any agreement as to sentence reached by the parties. The judge 11who presided at the trial or the judge who accepted the plea of 12guilty shall impose the sentence unless he is no longer 13sitting as a judge in that court. Where the judge does not 14impose sentence at the same time on all defendants who are 15convicted as a result of being involved in the same offense, 16the defendant or the State's Attorney may advise the 17sentencing court of the disposition of any other defendants 18who have been sentenced.19    (b-1) In imposing a sentence of imprisonment or periodic 20imprisonment for a Class 3 or Class 4 felony for which a 21sentence of probation or conditional discharge is an available 22sentence, if the defendant has no prior sentence of probation 23or conditional discharge and no prior conviction for a violent 24crime, the defendant shall not be sentenced to imprisonment 25before review and consideration of a presentence report and 26determination and explanation of why the particular evidence,   SB0008 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1information, factor in aggravation, factual finding, or other 2reasons support a sentencing determination that one or more of 3the factors under subsection (a) of Section 5-6-1 of this Code 4apply and that probation or conditional discharge is not an 5appropriate sentence. 6    (c) In imposing a sentence for a violent crime or for an 7offense of operating or being in physical control of a vehicle 8while under the influence of alcohol, any other drug or any 9combination thereof, or a similar provision of a local 10ordinance, when such offense resulted in the personal injury 11to someone other than the defendant, the trial judge shall 12specify on the record the particular evidence, information, 13factors in mitigation and aggravation or other reasons that 14led to his sentencing determination. The full verbatim record 15of the sentencing hearing shall be filed with the clerk of the 16court and shall be a public record.17    (c-1) In imposing a sentence for the offense of aggravated 18kidnapping for ransom, home invasion, armed robbery, 19aggravated vehicular hijacking, aggravated discharge of a 20firearm, or armed violence with a category I weapon or 21category II weapon, the trial judge shall make a finding as to 22whether the conduct leading to conviction for the offense 23resulted in great bodily harm to a victim, and shall enter that 24finding and the basis for that finding in the record.25    (c-1.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 26contrary, in imposing a sentence for an offense that requires   SB0008 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1a mandatory minimum sentence of imprisonment, the court may 2instead sentence the offender to probation, conditional 3discharge, or a lesser term of imprisonment it deems 4appropriate if: (1) the offense involves the use or possession 5of drugs, retail theft, or driving on a revoked license due to 6unpaid financial obligations; (2) the court finds that the 7defendant does not pose a risk to public safety; and (3) the 8interest of justice requires imposing a term of probation, 9conditional discharge, or a lesser term of imprisonment. The 10court must state on the record its reasons for imposing 11probation, conditional discharge, or a lesser term of 12imprisonment.13    (c-2) If the defendant is sentenced to prison, other than 14when a sentence of natural life imprisonment is imposed, at 15the time the sentence is imposed the judge shall state on the 16record in open court the approximate period of time the 17defendant will serve in custody according to the then current 18statutory rules and regulations for sentence credit found in 19Section 3-6-3 and other related provisions of this Code. This 20statement is intended solely to inform the public, has no 21legal effect on the defendant's actual release, and may not be 22relied on by the defendant on appeal.23    The judge's statement, to be given after pronouncing the 24sentence, other than when the sentence is imposed for one of 25the offenses enumerated in paragraph (a)(4) of Section 3-6-3, 26shall include the following:  SB0008 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    "The purpose of this statement is to inform the public of 2the actual period of time this defendant is likely to spend in 3prison as a result of this sentence. The actual period of 4prison time served is determined by the statutes of Illinois 5as applied to this sentence by the Illinois Department of 6Corrections and the Illinois Prisoner Review Board. In this 7case, assuming the defendant receives all of his or her 8sentence credit, the period of estimated actual custody is ... 9years and ... months, less up to 180 days additional earned 10sentence credit. If the defendant, because of his or her own 11misconduct or failure to comply with the institutional 12regulations, does not receive those credits, the actual time 13served in prison will be longer. The defendant may also 14receive an additional one-half day sentence credit for each 15day of participation in vocational, industry, substance abuse, 16and educational programs as provided for by Illinois statute."17    When the sentence is imposed for one of the offenses 18enumerated in paragraph (a)(2) of Section 3-6-3, other than 19first degree murder, and the offense was committed on or after 20June 19, 1998, and when the sentence is imposed for reckless 21homicide as defined in subsection (e) of Section 9-3 of the 22Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 if the 23offense was committed on or after January 1, 1999, and when the 24sentence is imposed for aggravated driving under the influence 25of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 26compounds, or any combination thereof as defined in   SB0008 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 211-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and when the sentence is 3imposed for aggravated arson if the offense was committed on 4or after July 27, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 592-176), and when the sentence is imposed for aggravated 6driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 7or intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 8thereof as defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of 9subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code 10committed on or after January 1, 2011 (the effective date of 11Public Act 96-1230), the judge's statement, to be given after 12pronouncing the sentence, shall include the following:13    "The purpose of this statement is to inform the public of 14the actual period of time this defendant is likely to spend in 15prison as a result of this sentence. The actual period of 16prison time served is determined by the statutes of Illinois 17as applied to this sentence by the Illinois Department of 18Corrections and the Illinois Prisoner Review Board. In this 19case, the defendant is entitled to no more than 4 1/2 days of 20sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 21imprisonment. Therefore, this defendant will serve at least 2285% of his or her sentence. Assuming the defendant receives 4 231/2 days credit for each month of his or her sentence, the 24period of estimated actual custody is ... years and ... 25months. If the defendant, because of his or her own misconduct 26or failure to comply with the institutional regulations   SB0008 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1receives lesser credit, the actual time served in prison will 2be longer."3    When a sentence of imprisonment is imposed for first 4degree murder and the offense was committed on or after June 519, 1998, the judge's statement, to be given after pronouncing 6the sentence, shall include the following:7    "The purpose of this statement is to inform the public of 8the actual period of time this defendant is likely to spend in 9prison as a result of this sentence. The actual period of 10prison time served is determined by the statutes of Illinois 11as applied to this sentence by the Illinois Department of 12Corrections and the Illinois Prisoner Review Board. In this 13case, the defendant is not entitled to sentence credit. 14Therefore, this defendant will serve 100% of his or her 15sentence."16    When the sentencing order recommends placement in a 17substance abuse program for any offense that results in 18incarceration in a Department of Corrections facility and the 19crime was committed on or after September 1, 2003 (the 20effective date of Public Act 93-354), the judge's statement, 21in addition to any other judge's statement required under this 22Section, to be given after pronouncing the sentence, shall 23include the following:24    "The purpose of this statement is to inform the public of 25the actual period of time this defendant is likely to spend in 26prison as a result of this sentence. The actual period of   SB0008 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1prison time served is determined by the statutes of Illinois 2as applied to this sentence by the Illinois Department of 3Corrections and the Illinois Prisoner Review Board. In this 4case, the defendant shall receive no earned sentence credit 5under clause (3) of subsection (a) of Section 3-6-3 until he or 6she participates in and completes a substance abuse treatment 7program or receives a waiver from the Director of Corrections 8pursuant to clause (4.5) of subsection (a) of Section 3-6-3."9    (c-4) Before the sentencing hearing and as part of the 10presentence investigation under Section 5-3-1, the court shall 11inquire of the defendant whether the defendant is currently 12serving in or is a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United 13States. If the defendant is currently serving in the Armed 14Forces of the United States or is a veteran of the Armed Forces 15of the United States and has been diagnosed as having a mental 16illness by a qualified psychiatrist or clinical psychologist 17or physician, the court may:18        (1) order that the officer preparing the presentence 19    report consult with the United States Department of 20    Veterans Affairs, Illinois Department of Veterans' 21    Affairs, or another agency or person with suitable 22    knowledge or experience for the purpose of providing the 23    court with information regarding treatment options 24    available to the defendant, including federal, State, and 25    local programming; and26        (2) consider the treatment recommendations of any   SB0008 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    diagnosing or treating mental health professionals 2    together with the treatment options available to the 3    defendant in imposing sentence.4    For the purposes of this subsection (c-4), "qualified 5psychiatrist" means a reputable physician licensed in Illinois 6to practice medicine in all its branches, who has specialized 7in the diagnosis and treatment of mental and nervous disorders 8for a period of not less than 5 years. 9    (c-6) In imposing a sentence, the trial judge shall 10specify, on the record, the particular evidence and other 11reasons which led to his or her determination that a motor 12vehicle was used in the commission of the offense. 13    (c-7) In imposing a sentence for a Class 3 or 4 felony, 14other than a violent crime as defined in Section 3 of the 15Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act, the court shall 16determine and indicate in the sentencing order whether the 17defendant has 4 or more or fewer than 4 months remaining on his 18or her sentence accounting for time served. 19    (d) When the defendant is committed to the Department of 20Corrections, the State's Attorney shall and counsel for the 21defendant may file a statement with the clerk of the court to 22be transmitted to the department, agency or institution to 23which the defendant is committed to furnish such department, 24agency or institution with the facts and circumstances of the 25offense for which the person was committed together with all 26other factual information accessible to them in regard to the   SB0008 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1person prior to his commitment relative to his habits, 2associates, disposition and reputation and any other facts and 3circumstances which may aid such department, agency or 4institution during its custody of such person. The clerk shall 5within 10 days after receiving any such statements transmit a 6copy to such department, agency or institution and a copy to 7the other party, provided, however, that this shall not be 8cause for delay in conveying the person to the department, 9agency or institution to which he has been committed.10    (e) The clerk of the court shall transmit to the 11department, agency or institution, if any, to which the 12defendant is committed, the following:13        (1) the sentence imposed;14        (2) any statement by the court of the basis for 15    imposing the sentence;16        (3) any presentence reports;17        (3.3) the person's last known complete street address 18    prior to incarceration or legal residence, the person's 19    race, whether the person is of Hispanic or Latino origin, 20    and whether the person is 18 years of age or older; 21        (3.5) any sex offender evaluations; 22        (3.6) any substance abuse treatment eligibility 23    screening and assessment of the defendant by an agent 24    designated by the State of Illinois to provide assessment 25    services for the Illinois courts; 26        (4) the number of days, if any, which the defendant   SB0008 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1    has been in custody and for which he is entitled to credit 2    against the sentence, which information shall be provided 3    to the clerk by the sheriff;4        (4.1) any finding of great bodily harm made by the 5    court with respect to an offense enumerated in subsection 6    (c-1);7        (5) all statements filed under subsection (d) of this 8    Section;9        (6) any medical or mental health records or summaries 10    of the defendant;11        (7) the municipality where the arrest of the offender 12    or the commission of the offense has occurred, where such 13    municipality has a population of more than 25,000 persons;14        (8) all statements made and evidence offered under 15    paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of this Section; and16        (9) all additional matters which the court directs the 17    clerk to transmit.18    (f) In cases in which the court finds that a motor vehicle 19was used in the commission of the offense for which the 20defendant is being sentenced, the clerk of the court shall, 21within 5 days thereafter, forward a report of such conviction 22to the Secretary of State. 23    (g) In cases in which the court finds that a firearm with a 24serial number reported as stolen on the Illinois State Police 25publicly accessible database was used in the commission of the 26offense for which the defendant is being sentenced, the clerk   SB0008 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1of the court shall, within 5 days thereafter, forward a report 2of such conviction to the Illinois State Police Division of 3Justice Services. 4(Source: P.A. 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-18, eff. 1-1-24; 5103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 6    Section 997. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 7severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 91, 2026.  SB0008 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 07753 RLC 17798 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    430 ILCS 65/3from Ch. 38, par. 83-35    430 ILCS 65/3.1from Ch. 38, par. 83-3.16    430 ILCS 65/7.10 new7    430 ILCS 65/8from Ch. 38, par. 83-88    430 ILCS 65/8.1from Ch. 38, par. 83-8.19    430 ILCS 66/56 new10    430 ILCS 68/5-2011    720 ILCS 5/24-3.812    720 ILCS 5/24-3.913    720 ILCS 5/24-3B14    720 ILCS 5/24-4.115    720 ILCS 5/24-9